Washington statutes.
RCW 41.08.080

Tenure of employment—Grounds for discharge, reduction, or deprivation of privileges.

The tenure of every one holding an office, place, position or employment under the provisions of this chapter shall be only during good behavior, and any such person may be removed or discharged, suspended without pay, demoted, or reduced in rank, or deprived of vacation privileges or other special privileges for any of the following reasons:

(1) Incompetency, inefficiency or inattention to or dereliction of duty;

(2) Dishonesty, intemperance, immoral conduct, insubordination, discourteous treatment of the public, or a fellow employee, or any other act of omission or commission tending to injure the public service; or any other willful failure on the part of the employee to properly conduct himself or herself; or any willful violation of the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations to be adopted hereunder;

(3) Mental or physical unfitness for the position which the employee holds;

(4) Dishonest, disgraceful, immoral or prejudicial conduct;

(5) Drunkenness or use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics, or any other habit forming drug, liquid or preparation to such extent that the use thereof interferes with the efficiency or mental or physical fitness of the employee, or which precludes the employee from properly performing the functions and duties of any position under civil service;

(6) Conviction of a felony, or a misdemeanor, involving moral turpitude;

(7) Any other act or failure to act which in the judgment of the civil service commissioners is sufficient to show the offender to be an unsuitable and unfit person to be employed in the public service.

[ 2007 c 218 s 5; 1935 c 31 s 8; RRS s 9558-8.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.